Montana, session 2025, SB281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 13-35-211, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-35-211. Electioneering -- soliciting information from electors. (1) A person may not do any
electioneering on election day within any polling place or any building in which an election is being held, or
within 100 feet of any entrance to the building in which the polling place is located, or within 100 feet of a line of
voters waiting outside of the polling location to vote that aids or promotes the success or defeat of any
candidate or ballot issue to be voted upon at the election.
(2) On election day, a candidate, a family member of a candidate, or a worker or volunteer for the
candidate's campaign may not distribute alcohol, tobacco, food, drink, or anything of value to a voter within a
polling place or a building in which an election is being held, or within 100 feet of an entrance to the building in
which the polling place is located, or within 100 feet of a line of voters waiting outside of the polling location to
vote.
(3) A person may not buy, sell, give, wear, or display at or about the polls on an election day any
badge, button, or other insignia that is designed or tends to aid or promote the success or defeat of any
candidate or ballot issue to be voted upon at the election.
(4) A person within a polling place or any building in which an election is being held may not solicit
from an elector, before or after the elector has marked a ballot and returned it to an election judge, information
as to whether the elector intends to vote or has voted for or against a candidate or ballot issue."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 281

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 281.1
copy of [this act] to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 281